Vermont, session 2025-2026, H364.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. APPROVAL OF ANNEXATION OF PROPERTY BY THE
VILLAGE OF SWANTON
(a) The General Assembly approves the annexation of property by the
Village of Swanton within the Town of Swanton, as set forth in this act. The
Board of Trustees of the Village approved the annexation of the property on
September 11, 2023.
(b) On April 7, 2023, the Village of Swanton became the owner of the
property located at 124 First Street in the Town of Swanton. The property is
adjacent to the parcel of property used by the Village for its Village offices and
is contiguous with the boundaries of the Village.
(c) Pursuant to 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 279 (Village of Swanton), § 2(e),
the boundaries of the Village may be altered at the discretion of the Board of
Trustees and with the concurrence of the General Assembly.
(d) The General Assembly hereby approves the alteration of the Village
boundaries and the Village’s annexation of the property located at 124 First
Street.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 27, 2025
VT LEG #384104 v.1